Massachusetts, session 194th, H1606.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause (4) of subsection (f) of Section 24A of Chapter 94C of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words
“and accompanied by a probable cause warrant issued pursuant to chapter 276”.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (f) of said Section 24A of said Chapter 94C is hereby
further amended by striking out clause (6), as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and
inserting in place thereof the following clause:-
(6) personnel of: (A) the United States attorney or a federal agency; provided, however,
that the data request is made pursuant to clause (4) or federal law; (B) the office of the attorney
general provided, however, that the data request is in connection with a bona fide specific
of 2

controlled substance or additional drug-related investigation; or (C) a district attorney’s office;
provided, however, that the data request is in connection with a bona fide specific controlled
substance or additional drug-related investigation;
of 2